District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

28:6-111

Limitation of actions and levies.

Repealed.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 717, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Oct. 23, 2014, D.C. Law 20-215, § 31, 61 DCR 13083

History

1981 Ed., § 28:6-111.
1973 Ed., § 28:6-111.

Prior Codifications

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.

Editor's Notes